Utah statutes.
31A-2-302.   Commissioner's disapproval.

(1)  When the law requires the commissioner's approval for a certain action without a deemer clause, that approval shall be express.  The commissioner's disapproval of an action is assumed if the commissioner does not act within 60 days after receiving the application for approval or give notice of the commissioner's reasonable extension of that time period with the commissioner's reasons for the extension.  Assumed disapproval under this subsection entitles the aggrieved person to request agency action under Section 63G-4-201.

(2)  When the law provides that a certain action is not effective if disapproved by the commissioner within a certain period, the affirmative approval by the commissioner may make the action effective at a designated earlier date, but not earlier than the date of the commissioner's affirmative approval.

(3)  Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to the extent that the law specifically provides otherwise.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

